Mississippi, session 2026, HB529.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  A pharmacist may dispense albendazole or mebendazole to a person, without requiring a prescription from a licensed health care practitioner, in accordance with any written standardized procedures or protocols issued by the State Board of Pharmacy, including, if required, providing the person with instructions on the proper use of albendazole or mebendazole. (2)  A pharmacist acting in a reasonably prudent manner is not criminally or civilly liable or subject to professional disciplinary action for dispensing albendazole or mebendazole in accordance with this section. (3)  The State Board of Pharmacy may adopt the rules necessary to implement this section. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.